Utah statutes.
20A-7-609.   Form of ballot -- Manner of voting.
(1)  The local clerk shall ensure that the number and ballot title are
presented upon the official ballot with, immediately adjacent to them, the
words "For" and "Against," each word presented with an adjacent square in
which the elector may indicate the elector's vote.
(2) (a)  Except as provided in Subsection (2)(c), and unless the county
legislative body calls a special election, the county clerk shall ensure that
county referenda that have qualified for the ballot appear on the next regular
general election ballot.
(b)  Unless the municipal legislative body calls a special election, the
municipal recorder or clerk shall ensure that municipal referenda that have
qualified for the ballot appear on the next regular municipal election ballot.
(c)  For referenda held in relation to the adoption of an ordinance imposing a
county option sales and use tax under Section 59-12-1102, the county clerk
shall ensure that referenda that have qualified for the ballot appear on the
ballot at the earlier of:
(i)  the next regular general election that is more than 155 days after the
date of the adoption of the ordinance; or
(ii)  the next municipal general election that is more than 155 days after the
date of the adoption of the ordinance.
(3) (a) (i) A voter desiring to vote in favor of the law that is the subject
of the referendum shall mark the square adjacent to the word "For."
(ii)  The law that is the subject of the referendum is effective if a majority
of voters mark "For."
(b) (i)  A voter desiring to vote against the law that is the subject of the
referendum petition shall mark the square following the word "Against."
(ii)  The law that is the subject of the referendum is not effective if a
majority of voters mark "Against."
